Utah statutes.
53A-1a-517.   Charter school assets.

(1) (a)  A charter school may receive, hold, manage, and use any devise, bequest, grant, endowment, gift, or donation of any asset made to the school for any of the purposes of this part.

(b)  Unless a donor or grantor specifically provides otherwise in writing, all assets described in Subsection (1) shall be presumed to be made to the charter school and shall be included in the charter school's assets.

(2)  It is unlawful for any person affiliated with a charter school to demand or request any gift, donation, or contribution from a parent, teacher, employee, or other person affiliated with the charter school as a condition for employment or enrollment at the school or continued attendance at the school.

(3)  All assets purchased with charter school funds shall be included in the charter school's assets.

(4)  A charter school may not dispose of its assets in violation of the provisions of this part, state board rules, policies of its chartering entity, or its charter, including the provisions governing the closure of a charter school under Section 53A-1a-510.5.



Enacted by Chapter 344, 2007 General Session

